Wisconsin, session 2025, AB458.
do enact as follows:AB458,11Section 1. 907.02 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB458,2,92907.02 (1) If scientific, technical, or other specialized knowledge will assist 3the trier of fact to understand the evidence or to determine a fact in issue, a witness 4qualified as an expert by knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education, may 5testify thereto in the form of an opinion or otherwise, if the proponent demonstrates 6to the court that it is more likely than not that the testimony is based upon 7sufficient facts or data, the testimony is the product of reliable principles and 8methods, and the witness has applied witness’s opinion reflects a reliable 9application of the principles and methods reliably to the facts of the case.AB458,210Section 2. Initial applicability.AB458,2,1211(1) This act first applies to actions or special proceedings that are commenced 12on the effective date of this subsection.AB458,2,1313